Illinois, session 104th, HB4327.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 340B 5Transparency, Reporting, and Accountability Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that: 7        (1) The intent of the 340B Drug Discount Program is to 8    provide resources to reach more eligible patients and 9    provide more comprehensive services. In doing so, 340B 10    covered entities provide discounted medicines to eligible 11    health care organizations for the purpose of improving 12    access to affordable medications and health care services 13    for low-income, underinsured, uninsured, or otherwise 14    vulnerable patients being treated at eligible hospitals, 15    clinics, federally qualified health centers (FQHC), and 16    safety-net hospitals in or adjacent to vulnerable 17    communities. 18        (2) Congress intended the 340B Drug Discount Program 19    to provide discounts to 340B covered entities that provide 20    direct health care to uninsured and underinsured 21    vulnerable patients. 22        (3) The appropriate and effective use of the 340B Drug 23    Discount Program is essential for improving health   HB4327 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1    outcomes, particularly for vulnerable and underserved 2    communities in rural, suburban, and urban areas throughout 3    Illinois meeting the definitions of vulnerable 4    communities. 5        (4) There is a need for statewide data to evaluate the 6    ways in which 340B Drug Discount Program utilization, 7    financial impact, and patient benefits enable vulnerable 8    Illinoisans to access care and fit into the overall health 9    care safety net framework. Additional transparency in 10    aggregate financial and operational reporting enhances 11    legislative oversight without interfering with federal 12    law. Increased transparency is needed to ensure that 13    vulnerable communities receive the benefits intended from 14    the Patient Access to Pharmacy Protection Act. 15        (5) To protect vulnerable communities, the General 16    Assembly must pass the Health Equity Infrastructure Access 17    and Stabilization Act. This includes creation of and 18    funding of the following components: 19            (A) the Vulnerable Community Health Capital Fund 20        Voluntary investment program; 21            (B) the Community Health Networks of Continuum 22        Care; 23            (C) the Illinois Safety Net Hospital Package; 24            (D) the Behavioral and Mental Health (BMH) Access 25        and Expansion Fund; 26            (E) the Stabilization and Sustainability   HB4327 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1        Operational Funding Program; 2            (F) the 340B Grantee Contract Pharmacy Access Act 3        integration; 4            (G) sustainable funding opportunities through 5        transparency of the 340B Federal Program; and 6            (H) the Unified Health Equity Omnibus Package. 7        (6) Savings associated with the federal 340B Drug 8    Discount Program may support the financial stability of 9    hospitals, FQHCs, Ryan White providers, rural providers, 10    and other historical safety-net institutions serving 11    vulnerable communities experiencing health care access 12    shortages, provider scarcity, or risk of service reduction 13    or closure. 14        (7) Vulnerable communities in the State of Illinois 15    are populations or geographic areas whose residents 16    experience disproportionate barriers to achieving optimal 17    health outcomes due to cumulative social, economic, 18    environmental, and structural disadvantages. These 19    communities are characterized by elevated health 20    disparities, limited access to health care services, and 21    increased exposure to risk factors, such as poverty, 22    inadequate insurance coverage, geographic isolation, 23    systemic discrimination, and unmet social determinants of 24    health, including housing, transportation, food security, 25    and environmental conditions, and who, as a result of 26    these conditions, experience reduced access to timely,   HB4327 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1    culturally competent, and geographically proximate 2    community-based hospital and health care services. 3        (8) This Act is intended solely to establish a 4    State-level reporting and transparency framework to allow 5    the 340B program to be evaluated, and shall not regulate 6    pricing, reimbursement, or participation in the federal 7    340B Program. 8    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 9    "340B covered entity" or "covered entity" means an entity 10in Illinois that qualifies as a covered entity under Section 11340B of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 12256b(a)(4).13    "340B Drug Discount Program" means the program established 14under Section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act, 1542 U.S.C. 256b.16    "340B entity type" means the designation of the 340B 17covered entity according to the entity types specified in 42 18U.S.C. 256b(a)(4). 19    "340B identification number" means the unique 20identification number provided by the Health Resources and 21Services Administration to identify a 340B-eligible entity in 22the 340B Office of Pharmacy Affairs Information System. 23    "340B contract pharmacy" means any pharmacy that is under 24contract with a 340B covered entity to dispense 340B drugs on 25behalf of the 340B covered entity and is either (i) located in   HB4327 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1Illinois and qualifies as a pharmacy under Section 3 of the 2Pharmacy Practice Act; or (ii) is located in a state, 3commonwealth, or territory of the United States, other than 4Illinois, and dispenses 340B drugs on behalf of the 340B 5covered entity.6    "340B grantee" means an entity in Illinois that qualifies 7as a covered entity under subparagraphs (A)-(K) of paragraph 8(4) of subsection (a) of Section 340B of the federal Public 9Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4)(A)-(K).10    "Critical Access Hospital" has the meaning given to that 11term in paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Section 5-5e of the 12Illinois Public Aid Code.13    "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under the Hospital 14Licensing Act or University of Illinois Hospital Act.15    "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" has the meaning given to the 16term "manufacturer" in the Wholesale Drug Distribution 17Licensing Act.18    "Reporting year" means the 12-month period to be covered 19by the report described in Section 15, as determined by the 20Department of Insurance. 21    "Safety-Net Hospital" has the meaning given to that term 22Section 5-5e.1 of the Illinois Public Aid Code.23    "Vulnerable communities" include, but are not limited to: 24        (1) low-income and economically disadvantaged 25    populations, including households below 80% of area median 26    income;   HB4327 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1        (2) racial and ethnic minority populations and 2    historically marginalized groups experiencing systemic 3    inequities; 4        (3) rural and medically underserved areas with limited 5    provider access or hospital closures; 6        (4) communities facing environmental justice burdens, 7    including high pollution exposure; 8        (5) populations with higher prevalence of chronic 9    disease and poor health outcomes linked to social 10    determinants of health; or11        (6) individuals with disabilities, older adults, 12    LGBTQ+ populations, and justice-involved individuals 13    identified as equity-focused populations under Illinois 14    law.  15    Section 15. 340B Drug Discount Program study. 16    (a) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 17Act, the Department of Insurance shall conduct a comprehensive 18study of how 340B covered entities and pharmaceutical 19manufacturers within Illinois participate in the 340B Drug 20Discount Program. The study shall include an examination of 21the impact of this participation by 340B covered entities on 22State health programs, such as Medicaid and the State 23Employees Group Insurance Program. The study shall include, 24but not be limited to, an assessment of: 25        (1) with respect to each covered entity, the:   HB4327 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1            (A) name; 2            (B) service address; 3            (C) 340B identification number; and 4            (D) 340B designation, as specified in 42 U.S.C 5        256b(a)(4); 6        (2) the aggregate amount, by 340B entity type, spent 7    on third-party administrators for the management of the 8    340B Drug Discount Program; 9        (3) the average difference between the cost imposed by 10    each covered entity on 340B-priced drugs and the 11    reimbursement rate for 340B drugs, organized by 12    therapeutic class; 13        (4) the aggregate and transaction-level acquisition 14    cost paid by a 340B covered entity for all prescription 15    drugs organized by therapeutic class obtained under the 16    340B Drug Discount Program and dispensed or administered 17    to patients; 18        (5) the aggregate and transaction-level payment amount 19    received by a 340B covered entity for all drugs organized 20    by therapeutic class obtained under the 340B Drug Discount 21    Program and dispensed or administered to patients;22        (6) with respect to 340B covered entities, a list of 23    contract pharmacies contracted with the 340B covered 24    entity to dispense 340B covered drugs;25        (7) the aggregate and transaction-level payment made 26    to contract pharmacies to dispense drugs obtained under   HB4327 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1    the 340B Drug Discount Program;2        (8) how the 340B covered entity uses any savings from 3    participating in the 340B Drug Discount Program, including 4    the total amount of 340B savings used for the provision of 5    charity care, community benefits (including identification 6    of the benefit program), any similar program of providing 7    unreimbursed or subsidized health care, and any remaining 8    savings for other purposes;9        (9) to the extent the information is available, the 10    percentage of total patients of the 340B covered entity 11    that were: 12            (A) served by a sliding fee scale for a 13        prescription drug dispensed or administered under the 14        340B Drug Discount Program; 15            (B) Medicaid customers and uninsured or 16        underinsured patients; 17            (C) racial and ethnic minority populations; 18            (D) patients residing in rural or Medically 19        Underserved Areas, including Governor's Exceptions, 20        designated by the Health Resources and Services 21        Administration, an agency of the United States 22        Department of Health and Human Services; 23            (E) populations with a higher prevalence of 24        chronic disease and poor health outcomes linked to 25        societal determinants of health; and 26            (F) individuals with disabilities, older adults,   HB4327 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1        LGBTQ+ populations, and justice-involved individuals; 2        (10) with respect to covered entities, the 340B 3    covered entity's total operating costs; 4        (11) with respect to covered entities, a copy of the 5    340B covered entity's financial assistance policy for the 6    reporting year; 7        (12) identification of the parties involved in the 8    340B procurement and dispensing process for each covered 9    facility; 10        (13) the aggregate and transaction-level payment made 11    to a pharmacy services administrative organization that 12    provides pharmacy services for a 340B contract pharmacy; 13        (14) the aggregate and transaction-level payment made 14    to a pharmacy benefit manager that provides pharmacy 15    benefit management services for a 340B covered entity, if 16    the information has not already been submitted in a 17    pharmaceutical manufacturer 340B audit;18        (15) the total cost and number of hours spent 19    preparing the data in response to the study;20        (16) with respect to pharmaceutical manufacturers, 21    copies of any 340B audits conducted during the previous 22    calendar year;23        (17) the specific pharmaceutical manufacturers that 24    are participating in the 340B Drug Discount Program in 25    Illinois;26        (18) with respect to pharmaceutical manufacturers, any   HB4327 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1    restrictions placed by that manufacturer on participation 2    in the 340B Drug Discount Program, any accompanying data 3    supporting those restrictions, and the reasoning;4        (19) a description of the impact of the 340B Drug 5    Discount Program on the patients and the community served 6    by each 340B covered entity;7        (20) with respect to pharmaceutical manufacturers, and 8    for the purpose of analyzing the impact of the 340B Drug 9    Discount Program, the aggregate amount of all 340B 10    discounts provided for each calendar year beginning in 11    2020; and12        (21) with respect to pharmaceutical manufacturers, the 13    aggregate amount of all 340B discounts provided for each 14    calendar year beginning in 2020, stated as a percentage of 15    the manufacturer's total annual revenues. 16    (b) The Department of Insurance may adopt rules as 17necessary to implement this Section. 18    (c) The Department of Insurance shall request the 19information described in subsection (a) in a format designated 20by the Department. All 340B covered entities, and 21pharmaceutical manufacturers doing business in the State of 22Illinois, shall comply with requests for information relevant 23to subsection (a) from the Department of Insurance in the 24format prescribed and within the timeframe specified. Failure 25by a covered entity or pharmaceutical manufacturer to submit 26all requested information described in subsection (a) within   HB4327 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b130 calendar days from the time frame specified by the 2Department shall result in a fine levied by the Director of: 3(1) $500 per day the information is past due; or (2) $100 per 4day the information is past due for hospitals with fewer than 5100 licensed beds, Critical Access Hospitals, Safety-Net 6Hospitals, and 340B grantees. Fines collected pursuant to this 7subsection shall be deposited into the Vulnerable Community 8Hospital Capital Investment Fund, which is hereby created as a 9special fund in the State treasury. All moneys in the 10Vulnerable Community Hospital Capital Investment Fund shall be 11used to support the health equity framework for supporting 12access to health care, creating sustainability, and supporting 13the implementation of the 340B Drug Discount Program. The 14Department of Insurance shall enforce this Section pursuant to 15the powers granted to it by law, including, but not limited to, 16the powers provided under Article XXIV of the Illinois 17Insurance Code. Subsections (2) through (5) of Section 403A of 18the Illinois Insurance Code shall apply to the imposition of 19any fine. 20    (d) Subject to subsection (e), the Department of Insurance 21shall maintain the confidentiality of any information 22submitted under subsection (c) for which the submitting person 23or entity includes a request that meets the criteria in 24paragraph (g) of subsection (1) of Section 7 of the Freedom of 25Information Act, and the information shall not be subject to 26subpoena in any private civil litigation in this State.   HB4327 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Department of 2Insurance from furnishing information collected from 340B 3covered entities or pharmaceutical manufacturers to State or 4federal authorities that may investigate, prosecute, or pursue 5other legal action against a 340B covered entity or 6pharmaceutical manufacturer for violations of 42 U.S.C. 256b 7or any applicable State law. 8    (e) The Department of Insurance shall submit a report of 9the findings of its study to the General Assembly and to the 10Governor by July 1, 2028. The report shall provide findings 11aggregated across 340B covered entities and pharmaceutical 12manufacturers and shall not disclose information or data 13attributed to any specific 340B covered entity or 14pharmaceutical manufacturer. The report shall note any 15requests for information from the Department of Insurance 16where the requested information was never submitted. The 17report shall address whether the data collected by the 18Department indicates a need for annual or biennial reporting 19by 340B covered entities. The report may include any 20aggregated findings related to the populations identified in 21paragraph (9) of subsection (a). The report shall address 22whether the data collected by the Department indicates a need 23for biennial reporting by 340B covered entities. 24    Section 20. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 25the Patient Access to Pharmacy Act is held invalid by a court,   HB4327 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1the validity of the remainder of this Act and the Patient 2Access to Pharmacy Act shall not be affected by that 3determination of invalidity. If the applicability of any 4provision of this Act or the Patient Access to Pharmacy Act to 5any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court, the 6applicability of that provision to other persons or 7circumstances shall not be affected by that determination of 8invalidity. 9    Section 95. Repeal. This Act is repealed on July 1, 2032. 10    Section 900. If and only if House Bill 2371 of the 104th 11General Assembly becomes law, then the Patient Access to 12Pharmacy Protection Act is amended by changing Section 40 and 13Section 99 as follows: 14    (10400HB2371sam002, Sec. 40)15    Sec. 40. Enforcement.16    (a) The Attorney General is authorized to enforce this Act 17under its general authority under the Attorney General Act. If 18the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that 19there is or has been a violation of Section 15 of this Act, 20then the Attorney General may commence a civil action in the 21name of the People of the State of Illinois to enforce the 22provisions of this Act in the appropriate circuit court.23    (b) Upon finding a violation of Section 15 of this Act, a   HB4327 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1court may order:2        (1) temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive 3    relief for any act, policy, or practice that violates this 4    Act;5        (2) money damages to be paid to the 340B covered 6    entity as a result of the violation of this Act;7        (3) the assessment of a civil penalty of up to $1,000 8    per violation for each violation of Section 15; or9        (4) any other relief.10    (c) A civil penalty imposed or a settlement or other 11payment made pursuant to this Act shall be made payable to the 12Attorney General's State Projects and Court Ordered 13Distribution Fund. 14(Source: 10400HB2371sam002.) 15    (10400HB2371sam002, Sec. 99)16    Sec. 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law or on the effective date of House Bill 4327 of the 18104th General Assembly, whichever is later; however, this Act 19does not take effect at all unless House Bill 4327 of the 104th 20General Assembly becomes law.21(Source: 10400HB2371sam002.) 22    Section 905. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 23Section 5.1038 as follows:   HB4327 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17027 BAB 30442 b1    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)2    Sec. 5.1038. The Vulnerable Community Hospital Capital 3Investment Fund. 4    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law or on the effective date of House Bill 2371 of the 6104th General Assembly, as amended by Senate Amendment No. 2, 7whichever is later; however, this Act does not take effect at 8all unless House Bill 2371 of the 104th General Assembly, as 9amended by Senate Amendment No. 2, becomes law.